test/src/morphology/N-kiorac_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - ǩiõrâč contract stem lukija: # Noun - full paradigm
     ǩiõrâč+N+Sg+Nom: ǩiõrâč
     ǩiõrâč+N+Sg+Gen: ǩiõrâč
     ǩiõrâč+N+Sg+Acc: ǩiõrâč
     ǩiõrâč+N+Sg+Ill: ǩiõrča
     ǩiõrâč+N+Sg+Loc: ǩiõrčest
     ǩiõrâč+N+Sg+Com: ǩiõrčin
     ǩiõrâč+N+Ess: ǩiõrčen
     ǩiõrâč+N+Par: ǩiõrčed
     ǩiõrâč+N+Sg+Abe: ǩiõrâčtää
     ǩiõrâč+N+Pl+Nom: ǩiõrâč
     ǩiõrâč+N+Pl+Gen: ǩiõrči
     ǩiõrâč+N+Pl+Acc: ǩiõrčid
     ǩiõrâč+N+Pl+Ill: ǩiõrčid
     ǩiõrâč+N+Pl+Loc: ǩiõrčin
     ǩiõrâč+N+Pl+Com: ǩiõrčivuiˊm
     ǩiõrâč+N+Pl+Abe: ǩiõrčitää
     
